Washington statutes.
RCW 39.110.060

Plan of economic development.

(1) Any authority established pursuant to this chapter must adopt a general plan of economic development finance objectives to be implemented by the authority during the period of the plan. The authority may exercise the powers authorized under this chapter prior to the adoption of the initial plan. In developing the plan, the authority must consider and set objectives for:

(a) Employment generation associated with the authority's programs;

(b) The application of funds to economic sectors and economic development activity evidencing need for improved access to capital markets and funding resources;

(c) Eligibility criteria for participants in authority programs;

(d) The use of funds and resources available from or through federal, state, local, and private sources and programs;

(e) New programs which serve a targeted need for financing assistance within the purposes of this chapter; and

(f) Opportunities to improve capital access as evidenced by programs existent in other localities or as they are made possible by results of private capital market circumstances.

(2) Upon adoption of the general plan the authority must conduct its programs in observance of the objectives established in the plan. The authority may periodically update the plan as determined necessary by the authority.

[ 2012 c 193 s 7.]